lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
LEXICON Casebecsul
+Inf:^+cInf^eni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeo§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeo§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeo§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeo§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeo§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeo§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeo§ni§igeuo§k #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igeo§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igeu§§l§l§igea§k           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeou§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeou§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igea§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igea§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igea§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igea§tt§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igea§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igea§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igea§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igea§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igea§tt§igea§l§igea§k      #;    ! tlak
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igea§tt§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igea§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék

LEXICON AddVerboeik
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeik;

LEXICON Repoeik
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoeik;
                    Imper1oeik;

LEXICON Imperoeik
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeik;
                      Nrepoeik;
LEXICON Imper1oeik
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrepoeik;
                      Nrep1oeik;

LEXICON Nrepoeik
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeik;
                      NImperoeik;

LEXICON Nrep1oeik
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoeik;
                      NImper1oeik;

LEXICON NImperoeik
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeik;
                      Potoeik;

LEXICON NImper1oeik
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Potoeik;
                      Pot1oeik;

LEXICON Potoeik
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeik;
             Caseoeik;

LEXICON Pot1oeik
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeik;
             Case1oeik; ! case1 if differs

LEXICON AddInfoeik
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
          Caseoeik;

LEXICON Verb
agrárkérdésez AddVerboeik;
alacsonyszintűségez AddVerboeik;
alkönyvtáraz AddVerboeik;
amorettez AddVerboeik;
apróhirdetésez AddVerboeik;
aszepszisez AddVerboeik;
bakfüvez AddVerboeik;
barkácsmesterez AddVerboeik;
bedekkerez AddVerboeik;
benzedrinez AddVerboeik;
betétez AddVerboeik;
billegőz AddVerboeik;
blokkházaz AddVerboeik;
bordásfalaz AddVerboeik;
britanniafémez AddVerboeik;
bármixerez AddVerboeik;
bércez AddVerboeik;
bökversez AddVerboeik;
büdösödőz AddVerboeik;
bőröndöz AddVerboeik;
cechez AddVerboeik;
cigánygyerekez AddVerboeik;
cipőpertliz AddVerboeik;
csavaroseszűségez AddVerboeik;
csendez AddVerboeik;
cserepesedésez AddVerboeik;
cserépedényez AddVerboeik;
csincsillanyulaz AddVerboeik;
csonthéjaz AddVerboeik;
csökkentőz AddVerboeik;
csörtetőz AddVerboeik;
csődületez AddVerboeik;
címezésez AddVerboeik;
degeszez AddVerboeik;
derűsítésez AddVerboeik;
diliházaz AddVerboeik;
dombtetőz AddVerboeik;
dzsesszesítőz AddVerboeik;
díjügyletez AddVerboeik;
döglesztetőz AddVerboeik;
dörgölődőz AddVerboeik;
dűlőz AddVerboeik;
egerészölyvez AddVerboeik;
egyetemesülőz AddVerboeik;
egységesítőz AddVerboeik;
ekeszarvaz AddVerboeik;
ellenintézkedésez AddVerboeik;
elmérgesedésez AddVerboeik;
elérzékenyedésez AddVerboeik;
előzékenyítőz AddVerboeik;
emlékezetesítőz AddVerboeik;
enyhítésez AddVerboeik;
eredményezésez AddVerboeik;
erőfeszítésez AddVerboeik;
esküvőz AddVerboeik;
esőzésez AddVerboeik;
ezerjófüvez AddVerboeik;
fakötésez AddVerboeik;
fazekasműhelyez AddVerboeik;
fegyverkezőz AddVerboeik;
fejezetez AddVerboeik;
fekvésez AddVerboeik;
felhősödőz AddVerboeik;
fenantrénez AddVerboeik;
fertőtlenítésez AddVerboeik;
fezőröz AddVerboeik;
firnez AddVerboeik;
fogaskerekez AddVerboeik;
fosszilisedésez AddVerboeik;
fullerföldez AddVerboeik;
félistenez AddVerboeik;
fényez AddVerboeik;
fétisez AddVerboeik;
fölöslegesítőz AddVerboeik;
függönyrudaz AddVerboeik;
füstifecskéz AddVerboeik;
főfelügyeletez AddVerboeik;
főtlenítőz AddVerboeik;
fűtőtestez AddVerboeik;
gennyképződésez AddVerboeik;
gittelőz AddVerboeik;
gurítókerekez AddVerboeik;
gyermekláncfüvez AddVerboeik;
gyérítésez AddVerboeik;
gyöngyözésez AddVerboeik;
győzelmesítésez AddVerboeik;
gázolajaz AddVerboeik;
górcsövezésez AddVerboeik;
görebez AddVerboeik;
gőnyéz AddVerboeik;
hadviselésez AddVerboeik;
hallgatócsőz AddVerboeik;
hangszínezetez AddVerboeik;
hattyúnyakaz AddVerboeik;
hegesedőz AddVerboeik;
helyszínelőz AddVerboeik;
hercegségez AddVerboeik;
hevesítésez AddVerboeik;
himpellérez AddVerboeik;
hittérítésez AddVerboeik;
hozzáillesztésez AddVerboeik;
hátterez AddVerboeik;
hímezgetőz AddVerboeik;
hömpölygésez AddVerboeik;
hőcsövez AddVerboeik;
hűvösödésez AddVerboeik;
időmérőz AddVerboeik;
ijedezőz AddVerboeik;
immunbetegségez AddVerboeik;
inszurgensez AddVerboeik;
iránykiegyenlítőz AddVerboeik;
ivóléz AddVerboeik;
jegyzékez AddVerboeik;
jelmezkölcsönzőz AddVerboeik;
jászfenyőz AddVerboeik;
jövendölésez AddVerboeik;
kampósszögöz AddVerboeik;
karénekez AddVerboeik;
kedvesítésez AddVerboeik;
kelepelőz AddVerboeik;
keményedésez AddVerboeik;
kenőkeféz AddVerboeik;
keresztényez AddVerboeik;
keserítőz AddVerboeik;
kezdetez AddVerboeik;
kilencedévez AddVerboeik;
kisegítőz AddVerboeik;
kisstílűsítésez AddVerboeik;
kitüremkedésez AddVerboeik;
kompetensedésez AddVerboeik;
koponyatetőz AddVerboeik;
kozáküldözésez AddVerboeik;
kultúrmérnököz AddVerboeik;
káinbélyegez AddVerboeik;
kékítésez AddVerboeik;
kénytelenedőz AddVerboeik;
kérdésföltevésez AddVerboeik;
készségez AddVerboeik;
kézbevételez AddVerboeik;
kísérésez AddVerboeik;
köldököz AddVerboeik;
könnyülőz AddVerboeik;
köpűz AddVerboeik;
köszönőz AddVerboeik;
kövesedésez AddVerboeik;
közelmúltaz AddVerboeik;
középáraz AddVerboeik;
külsőségez AddVerboeik;
kőfejtőz AddVerboeik;
lasztexez AddVerboeik;
legényez AddVerboeik;
lemezvezérlőz AddVerboeik;
letyegésez AddVerboeik;
licitez AddVerboeik;
londinerez AddVerboeik;
lángészez AddVerboeik;
légterez AddVerboeik;
léptűsítőz AddVerboeik;
löttyedőz AddVerboeik;
lőporgyáraz AddVerboeik;
magáncégez AddVerboeik;
malomkövez AddVerboeik;
megbecslésez AddVerboeik;
megkötésez AddVerboeik;
megvetésez AddVerboeik;
melltűz AddVerboeik;
menetelésez AddVerboeik;
meredőz AddVerboeik;
meszesvödöröz AddVerboeik;
mikroamperez AddVerboeik;
missez AddVerboeik;
mozgáskorlátozottaz AddVerboeik;
málháslovaz AddVerboeik;
mélyítésez AddVerboeik;
mérséklőségez AddVerboeik;
műfűz AddVerboeik;
művészkedőz AddVerboeik;
nagylelkűsködőz AddVerboeik;
napibérez AddVerboeik;
nehezedésez AddVerboeik;
nemszeretemségez AddVerboeik;
nihilez AddVerboeik;
nyekegőz AddVerboeik;
nyerőz AddVerboeik;
nyírez AddVerboeik;
négyesez AddVerboeik;
névlegesítőz AddVerboeik;
nősülőz AddVerboeik;
oldalfelezőz AddVerboeik;
orrsprayez AddVerboeik;
pamfletez AddVerboeik;
partnerségez AddVerboeik;
pelyhedzésez AddVerboeik;
perecez AddVerboeik;
pestieskedőz AddVerboeik;
pihentségez AddVerboeik;
piperézőz AddVerboeik;
platinaszőkéz AddVerboeik;
popegyüttesez AddVerboeik;
primőröz AddVerboeik;
puccparádéz AddVerboeik;
pársziellenességez AddVerboeik;
pérez AddVerboeik;
pöffentésez AddVerboeik;
pötyögtetésez AddVerboeik;
rangidősítőz AddVerboeik;
regálebérlőz AddVerboeik;
rekviemez AddVerboeik;
rendszerszervezésez AddVerboeik;
restelkedőz AddVerboeik;
rezesítésez AddVerboeik;
rittyentetőz AddVerboeik;
ruharészez AddVerboeik;
rémtettez AddVerboeik;
részvénypakettez AddVerboeik;
rózsaszínez AddVerboeik;
röpülésez AddVerboeik;
sapkaellenzőz AddVerboeik;
segélyhelyez AddVerboeik;
selypesülőz AddVerboeik;
seriffez AddVerboeik;
sikérez AddVerboeik;
sokadalmaz AddVerboeik;
sprayesítőz AddVerboeik;
stílszerűsítésez AddVerboeik;
szakköröz AddVerboeik;
szedelődzködőz AddVerboeik;
szegülésez AddVerboeik;
szellősítésez AddVerboeik;
szemetesez AddVerboeik;
szentesülésez AddVerboeik;
szerkőz AddVerboeik;
szinkronfelvételez AddVerboeik;
szurokszenez AddVerboeik;
székházaz AddVerboeik;
színképez AddVerboeik;
szörnyülködőz AddVerboeik;
szőlészetez AddVerboeik;
sínhevederez AddVerboeik;
süppedezőz AddVerboeik;
tartóvázaz AddVerboeik;
telekrészez AddVerboeik;
tercettez AddVerboeik;
terpeszez AddVerboeik;
tevőlegesítőz AddVerboeik;
torznégyszögöz AddVerboeik;
tárnokmesterez AddVerboeik;
tévutaz AddVerboeik;
tömődésez AddVerboeik;
törökösödésez AddVerboeik;
tőgyez AddVerboeik;
utánanézőz AddVerboeik;
vasművez AddVerboeik;
versenylovaz AddVerboeik;
vetődőz AddVerboeik;
világűröz AddVerboeik;
vámkötelesítésez AddVerboeik;
vélekedésez AddVerboeik;
víziborjaz AddVerboeik;
zengzetesülőz AddVerboeik;
zárfékezőz AddVerboeik;
ádámkosztümöz AddVerboeik;
árképzésez AddVerboeik;
édesfűz AddVerboeik;
életművez AddVerboeik;
érettségizésez AddVerboeik;
észlelőz AddVerboeik;
ízlelőz AddVerboeik;
ömlesztőz AddVerboeik;
öreglebbencsez AddVerboeik;
ötvenrubelesez AddVerboeik;
üdvösödőz AddVerboeik;
üszkösítőz AddVerboeik;
őrleményez AddVerboeik;
